Illinois, session 104th, SB2897.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Personal Information Protection Act is 5amended by changing Sections 5 and 45 as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 530/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act: 8    "Data collector" may include, but is not limited to, 9government agencies, public and private universities, 10privately and publicly held corporations, financial 11institutions, retail operators, and any other entity that, for 12any purpose, handles, collects, disseminates, or otherwise 13deals with nonpublic personal information. 14    "Breach of the security of the system data" or "breach" 15means unauthorized acquisition of computerized data that 16compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of 17personal information maintained by the data collector. "Breach 18of the security of the system data" does not include good faith 19acquisition of personal information by an employee or agent of 20the data collector for a legitimate purpose of the data 21collector, provided that the personal information is not used 22for a purpose unrelated to the data collector's business or 23subject to further unauthorized disclosure.   SB2897- 2 -LRB104 16891 SPS 30302 b1    "Health insurance information" means an individual's 2health insurance policy number or subscriber identification 3number, any unique identifier used by a health insurer to 4identify the individual, or any medical information in an 5individual's health insurance application and claims history, 6including any appeals records.7    "Immigration or citizenship status information" means any 8information concerning: (i) the status of an individual's 9citizenship of the United States or any other country; or (ii) 10the legal right, or lack thereof, of an individual to reside in 11or otherwise to be present in the United States. "Immigration 12or citizenship status information" includes an individual's 13nationality and country of origin.14    "Medical information" means any information regarding an 15individual's medical history, mental or physical condition, or 16medical treatment or diagnosis by a healthcare professional, 17including such information provided to a website or mobile 18application. 19    "Personal information" means either of the following:20        (1) An individual's first name or first initial and 21    last name in combination with any one or more of the 22    following data elements, when either the name or the data 23    elements are not encrypted or redacted or are encrypted or 24    redacted but the keys to unencrypt or unredact or 25    otherwise read the name or data elements have been 26    acquired without authorization through the breach of   SB2897- 3 -LRB104 16891 SPS 30302 b1    security: 2            (A) Social Security number. 3            (B) Driver's license number or State 4        identification card number. 5            (C) Account number or credit or debit card number, 6        or an account number or credit card number in 7        combination with any required security code, access 8        code, or password that would permit access to an 9        individual's financial account. 10            (D) Medical information.11            (E) Health insurance information.12            (F) Unique biometric data generated from 13        measurements or technical analysis of human body 14        characteristics used by the owner or licensee to 15        authenticate an individual, such as a fingerprint, 16        retina or iris image, or other unique physical 17        representation or digital representation of biometric 18        data.19            (G) Immigration or citizenship status information.20        (2) User name or email address, in combination with a 21    password or security question and answer that would permit 22    access to an online account, when either the user name or 23    email address or password or security question and answer 24    are not encrypted or redacted or are encrypted or redacted 25    but the keys to unencrypt or unredact or otherwise read 26    the data elements have been obtained through the breach of   SB2897- 4 -LRB104 16891 SPS 30302 b1    security. 2    "Personal information" does not include publicly available 3information that is lawfully made available to the general 4public from federal, State, or local government records. 5(Source: P.A. 99-503, eff. 1-1-17.) 6    (815 ILCS 530/45)7    Sec. 45. Data security.8    (a) A data collector that owns or licenses, or maintains 9or stores but does not own or license, records that contain 10personal information concerning an Illinois resident shall 11implement and maintain reasonable security measures to protect 12those records from unauthorized access, acquisition, 13destruction, use, modification, or disclosure.14    (a-5) A data collector shall not own, maintain, license, 15store, or disclose records that contain immigration or 16citizenship status information concerning an Illinois 17resident. This subsection shall not apply to government 18agencies, public and private universities, or financial 19institutions.20    (b) A contract for the disclosure of personal information 21concerning an Illinois resident that is maintained by a data 22collector must include a provision requiring the person to 23whom the information is disclosed to implement and maintain 24reasonable security measures to protect those records from 25unauthorized access, acquisition, destruction, use,   SB2897- 5 -LRB104 16891 SPS 30302 b1modification, or disclosure.2    (c) If a state or federal law requires a data collector to 3provide greater protection to records that contain personal 4information concerning an Illinois resident that are 5maintained by the data collector and the data collector is in 6compliance with the provisions of that state or federal law, 7the data collector shall be deemed to be in compliance with the 8provisions of this Section.9    (d) A data collector that is subject to and in compliance 10with the standards established pursuant to Section 501(b) of 11the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999, 15 U.S.C. Section 6801, 12shall be deemed to be in compliance with the provisions of this 13Section. 14(Source: P.A. 99-503, eff. 1-1-17.)